South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3946.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-11-360(7) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (7) An owner constructing a farm building or portable storage building with less than fivefifty thousand square feet of floor space and used only for livestock, poultry, or storage. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----